Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-915
Orders out of court; record.

Orders made out of court shall be forthwith entered by the clerk in the record of the court in the same manner as orders made in term.

R.S.1867, Code § 579, p. 495;

R.S.1913, § 7731;

C.S.1922, § 8675;

C.S.1929, § 20-915;

R.S.1943, § 25-915;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 11.